Maine, session 132, LD1782.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §2122, sub-§3 is enacted to read:
3. Base per ton host fee; surcharge for noncompliance with recycling goals; free
disposal. Notwithstanding any provision of law or existing agreement to the contrary, the
department and the Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Bureau of
General Services, referred to in this subsection as "the bureau," shall ensure that the
contract operator of any state-owned or state-operated landfill pays a base per ton host fee
of not less than $5.00 per ton for all acceptable waste disposed of at the landfill. The
department shall annually index the base per ton host fee amount for inflation. All revenues
generated by the base per ton host fee must be allocated as follows:
A. Fifty percent to the municipality hosting the landfill to offset municipal costs and
burdens; and
B. Fifty percent to the regional school unit or other school unit serving the host
municipality to alleviate the property tax impact associated with the municipality's
hosting the landfill.
This subsection applies to any existing host community compensation and facility oversight
or similar agreement for a state-owned or state-operated landfill and to any future such
agreement.
The department shall impose a per ton surcharge on municipal solid waste sent to the state-
operated or state-owned landfill from a municipality that is not making reasonable efforts
to meet the State's recycling goals pursuant to sections 2132 and 2133. The department
shall set the surcharge at a level sufficient to incentivize compliance.
The bureau and the department shall require the contract operator of a state-owned or state-
operated landfill to provide free disposal of household municipal solid waste for residents
of a municipality hosting a state-owned or state-operated landfill.
Sec. 2. 38 MRSA §2122, sub-§4 is enacted to read:
4. Comprehensive solid waste management plan. The department and the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Bureau of General Services, referred
to in this subsection as "the bureau," shall jointly develop a comprehensive solid waste
management plan for a state-owned or state-operated landfill. In creating a plan under this
subsection, the department and bureau shall consult with owners and operators of public
and private solid waste management facilities and municipalities and quasi-municipal
entities involved with the state-owned or state-operated landfill.
Page 1 - 132LR1548(01)

A. A plan under this subsection must:
(1) Identify short-term and long-term municipal solid waste disposal and
processing options for the municipalities;
(2) Evaluate feasible disposal options for wastewater treatment plant sludge, in
light of perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances contamination restrictions;
(3) Ensure the use of the state-owned or state-operated landfill is consistent with
the solid waste hierarchy under section 2101 and lessens the negative economic
and environmental effects of unprocessed municipal solid waste, wastewater
treatment plant sludge and bulky waste disposal at the landfill;
(4) Propose any legislative or regulatory changes needed to preserve landfill
capacity, mitigate host-community burdens and improve statewide recycling and
composting rates; and
(5) Include options for ongoing host-community compensation following closure
of a state-owned or state-operated landfill for at least 20 years.
B. The department and the bureau shall jointly submit a draft plan for a landfill under
this subsection to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction
over environment and natural resources matters along with any initial
recommendations for legislative action. The department and the bureau shall jointly
submit a final plan for a landfill under this subsection within 2 months to the same joint
standing committee, which may report out legislation to implement recommendations
from the plan to the next regular session of the Legislature.
Sec. 3. Updated base per ton host fee; Juniper Ridge Landfill and City of
Old Town. Notwithstanding any provision of law or existing agreement to the contrary,
the Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Bureau of General Services,
referred to in this section as "the bureau," and the Department of Environmental Protection,
referred to in this section as "the department," shall ensure that the contract operator of any
state-owned or state-operated landfill pays a base per ton host fee of not less than $5.00 per
ton for all acceptable waste disposed of at the landfill pursuant to the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 38, section 2122, subsection 3. The department and the bureau shall work
with the Juniper Ridge Landfill's contract operator to negotiate a further amendment to the
Host Community Compensation and Facility Oversight Agreement dated December 8,
2005 and signed by the State of Maine, the City of Old Town and Casella Waste Systems,
Inc. that more fairly and adequately compensates the City of Old Town for the burden of
hosting the Juniper Ridge Landfill. The department shall ensure that the base per ton host
fee amount under this section is indexed annually for inflation.
All revenues generated by the base per ton host fee must be allocated as follows:
1. Fifty percent to the City of Old Town to offset municipal costs and burdens; and
2. Fifty percent to Regional School Unit 34 to alleviate the property tax impact
associated with hosting the landfill.
Sec. 4. Surcharge on municipalities not meeting recycling goals;
distribution; Juniper Ridge Landfill and City of Old Town. The Department of
Environmental Protection shall impose a per ton surcharge on municipal solid waste sent
to the Juniper Ridge Landfill from a municipality that is not making reasonable efforts to
Page 2 - 132LR1548(01)

414 meet the State's recycling goals pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 38, sections
425 2132 and 2133 pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 38, section 2122, subsection
436 3. The surcharge must be set at a level sufficient to incentivize compliance. A minimum
447 of 50% of the total surcharge revenue must be allocated to the City of Old Town and the
458 remainder must be allocated to Regional School Unit 34.
Sec. 5. Free disposal for residents of City of Old Town and Indian Island.
Pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 38, section 2122, subsection 3, the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Bureau of General Services and the
Department of Environmental Protection shall require the contract operator of the Juniper
Ridge Landfill to provide free disposal of household municipal solid waste for residents of
the City of Old Town and Indian Island.
Sec. 6. Comprehensive solid waste management plan for Juniper Ridge
Landfill and City of Old Town. Pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 38,
section 2122, subsection 4, the Department of Administrative and Financial Services,
Bureau of General Services, referred to in this section as "the bureau," and the Department
of Environmental Protection, referred to in this section as "the department," shall jointly
develop a comprehensive solid waste management plan for the Juniper Ridge Landfill in
the City of Old Town. The department and the bureau shall consult with the Old Town
City Council and Landfill Advisory Board; the Penobscot Nation's Tribal Council or
representatives; owners and operators of public and private solid waste management
facilities; and municipalities and quasi-municipal entities, including any other communities
hosting state landfills and representatives for the approximately 159 municipalities
formerly or currently served by Municipal Review Committee, Inc. or the former
Penobscot Energy Recovery Company.
1. The plan must:
A. Identify short-term and long-term municipal solid waste disposal and processing
options for those municipalities;
B. Evaluate feasible disposal options for wastewater treatment plant sludge, in light of
perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances contamination restrictions;
C. Ensure the use of the Juniper Ridge Landfill is consistent with the solid waste
hierarchy as stated in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 38, section 2101 and lessens
the negative economic and environmental effects of unprocessed municipal solid
waste, wastewater treatment plant sludge and bulky waste disposal at the Juniper Ridge
Landfill;
D. Propose any legislative or regulatory changes needed to preserve landfill capacity,
mitigate host-community burdens and improve statewide recycling and composting
rates; and
E. Include options for ongoing compensation of the City of Old Town in the event of
the closure of the Juniper Ridge Landfill for at least 20 years.
2. The department and the bureau shall jointly submit a draft plan to the Joint Standing
Committee on Environment and Natural Resources by November 1, 2025 with any initial
recommendations for legislative action. The department and the bureau shall jointly submit
a final plan by January 15, 2026 to the same committee, which may report out legislation
Page 3 - 132LR1548(01)

414 to implement recommendations from the plan to the Second Regular Session of the 132nd
425 Legislature.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.